th: ส่วนผสมน้ำหอม ผู้ขนส่ง/ตัวทำละลาย: DPG (ไดโพรพิลีนไกลคอล); เอทานอล (แอลกอฮอล์); น้ำมันมะพร้าวสกัดแยกส่วน (MCT); กลีเซอรีน; IPM (ไอโซโพรพิลไมริสเตต); น้ำมันโจโจ้บา; บริสุทธิ์ (ไม่เจือจาง); โพรพิลีนไกลคอล (PG); TEC (ไตรเอทิลซิเตรต); อื่นๆ
fr: Support ou solvant de l’ingrédient de parfumerie: DPG (dipropylène glycol); Éthanol (alcool); Huile de noix de coco fractionnée (TCM); Glycérine; IPM (myristate d’isopropyle); Huile de jojoba; Pur (non dilué); Propylène glycol (PG); TEC (citrate de triéthyle); Autre
sl-SI: Nosilec/topilo parfumske sestavine: DPG (dipropilenglikol); Etanol (alkohol); Frakcionirano kokosovo olje (MCT); Glicerin; IPM (izopropil miristat); Jojobino olje; Čisto (nerazredčeno); Propilenglikol (PG); TEC (trietil citrat); Drugo
de: Trägerstoff bzw. Lösungsmittel des Duftstoffs: DPG (Dipropylenglykol); Ethanol (Alkohol); Fraktioniertes Kokosöl (MCT); Glycerin; IPM (Isopropylmyristat); Jojobaöl; Pur (unverdünnt); Propylenglykol (PG); TEC (Triethylcitrat); Sonstige
ru: Растворитель парфюмерного ингредиента: ДПГ (дипропиленгликоль); Этанол (спирт); Фракционированное кокосовое масло (MCT); Глицерин; ИПМ (изопропилмиристат); Масло жожоба; В чистом виде (неразбавленный); Пропиленгликоль (ПГ); ТЭЦ (триэтилцитрат); Другое
sk-SK: Nosná zložka/rozpúšťadlo v parfumérii: DPG (dipropylénglykol); Etanol (alkohol); Frakcionovaný kokosový olej (MCT); Glycerín; IPM (izopropylmyristát); Jojobový olej; Čistý (neriedený); Propylénglykol (PG); TEC (trietylcitrát); Iné
ro-RO: Transportator/solvent de ingrediente de parfumerie: DPG (dipropilenglicol); Etanol (alcool); Ulei de cocos fracționat (MCT); Glicerină; IPM (miristat de izopropil); Ulei de jojoba; Pur (nediluat); Propilenglicol (PG); TEC (citrat de trietil); Altele
hr-HR: Nosioc/otapalo parfumerijskog sastojka: DPG (dipropilenglikol); Etanol (alkohol); Frakcionirano kokosovo ulje (MCT); Glicerin; IPM (izopropil miristat); Ulje jojobe; Čisto (nerazrijeđeno); Propilenglikol (PG); TEC (trietil citrat); Ostalo
pt-PT: Ingrediente de perfumaria transportador/solvente: DPG (dipropilenoglicol); Etanol (álcool); Óleo de coco fracionado (TCM); Glicerina; Miristato de isopropilo (IPM); Óleo de jojoba; Puro (não diluído); Propilenoglicol (PG); Citrato de trietilo (TEC); Outro
cs: Nosič/rozpouštědlo parfémové přísady: DPG (dipropylenglykol); Ethanol (alkohol); Frakcionovaný kokosový olej (MCT); Glycerin; IPM (isopropylmyristát); Jojobový olej; Čistý (neředěný); Propylenglykol (PG); TEC (triethylcitrát); Ostatní
fi: Hajusteen kantaja- tai liuotinaine: DPG (dipropyleeniglykoli); Etanoli (alkoholi); Fraktioitu kookosöljy (MCT); Glyseriini; IPM (isopropyylimyristaatti); Jojobaöljy; Laimentamaton; Propyleeniglykoli (PG); TEC (trietyylisitraatti); Muu
ko: 향수 원료 캐리어/용매: DPG(디프로필렌 글리콜); 에탄올(알코올); 프랙셔네이티드 코코넛 오일(MCT); 글리세린; IPM(이소프로필 미리스테이트); 호호바 오일; 원액(희석하지 않음); 프로필렌 글리콜(PG); TEC(트리에틸 시트레이트); 기타
el: Συστατικό αρωματοποιίας μεταφορέας/solvent: DPG (διπροπυλενογλυκόλη); Αιθανόλη (αλκοόλ); Κλασματοποιημένο έλαιο καρύδας (MCT); Γλυκερίνη; IPM (μυριστικός ισοπροπυλεστέρας); Έλαιο χοχόμπα; Καθαρό (χωρίς αραίωση); Προπυλενογλυκόλη (PG); TEC (κιτρικός τριαιθυλεστέρας); Άλλο
pt-BR: Classifica o estilo/construção geral do estojo (bolsa flexível vs. estojo rígido vs. híbrido).: DPG (dipropilenoglicol); Etanol (álcool); Óleo de coco fracionado (TCM); Glicerina; IPM (miristato de isopropila); Óleo de jojoba; Puro (não diluído); Propilenoglicol (PG); TEC (citrato de trietila); Outro
vi: Chất mang/dung môi nguyên liệu nước hoa: DPG (dipropylene glycol); Ethanol (cồn); Dầu dừa phân đoạn (MCT); Glycerin; IPM (isopropyl myristate); Dầu jojoba; Nguyên chất (chưa pha loãng); Propylene glycol (PG); TEC (triethyl citrate); Khác
nl: Parfumerie-ingrediënt drager/oplosmiddel: DPG (dipropyleenglycol); Ethanol (alcohol); Gefractioneerde kokosolie (MCT); Glycerine; IPM (isopropylmyristaat); Jojoba-olie; Puur (onverdund); Propyleenglycol (PG); TEC (triëthylcitraat); Overig
it: Veicolo/solvente dell'ingrediente di profumeria: DPG (glicole dipropilenico); Etanolo (alcol); Olio di cocco frazionato (MCT); Glicerina; IPM (miristato di isopropile); Olio di jojoba; Puro (non diluito); Glicole propilenico (PG); TEC (trietil citrato); Altro
es: Vehículo o solvente del Ingredientes de perfumería: DPG (dipropilenglicol); Etanol (alcohol); Aceite de coco fraccionado (TCM); Glicerina; IPM (miristato de isopropilo); Aceite de jojoba; Puro (sin diluir); Propilenglicol (PG); TEC (citrato de trietilo); Otro
pl: Nośnik/rozpuszczalnik składnika perfumeryjnego: DPG (glikol dipropylenowy); Etanol (alkohol); Frakcjonowany olej kokosowy (MCT); Gliceryna; IPM (mirystynian izopropylu); Olej jojoba; Czysty (nierozcieńczony); Glikol propylenowy (PG); TEC (cytrynian trietylu); Inne
bg-BG: Носител/разтворител на парфюмерийна съставка: DPG (дипропилен гликол); Етанол (алкохол); Фракционирано кокосово масло (MCT); Глицерин; IPM (изопропил миристат); Масло от жожоба; Чист (неразреден); Пропилен гликол (PG); TEC (триетил цитрат); Друг
da: Parfumeingrediens' bærestof/opløsningsmiddel: DPG (dipropylenglykol); Ethanol (alkohol); Fraktioneret kokosolie (MCT); Glycerin; IPM (isopropylmyristat); Jojobaolie; Ren (ublandet); Propylenglykol (PG); TEC (triethylcitrat); Andet
ja: 香料原料キャリア／溶剤: DPG (ジプロピレングリコール); エタノール（アルコール）; 分留ココナッツオイル (MCT); グリセリン; IPM (ミリスチン酸イソプロピル); ホホバオイル; 原液（未希釈）; プロピレングリコール (PG); TEC (クエン酸トリエチル); その他
en: Perfumery ingredient carrier/solvent: DPG (dipropylene glycol); Ethanol (alcohol); Fractionated coconut oil (MCT); Glycerin; IPM (isopropyl myristate); Jojoba oil; Neat (undiluted); Propylene glycol (PG); TEC (triethyl citrate); Other
lt-LT: Parfumerijos ingrediento nešiklis / tirpiklis: DPG (dipropilenglikolis); Etanolis (alkoholis); Frakcionuotas kokosų aliejus (MCT); Glicerinas; IPM (izopropilo miristatas); Simondsijų aliejus; Grynas (neskiestas); Propilenglikolis (PG); TEC (trietilo citratas); Kita
hu: Parfümkészítési összetevő hordozója/oldószere: DPG (dipropilénglikol); Etanol (alkohol); Frakcionált kókuszolaj (MCT); Glicerin; IPM (izopropil-mirisztát); Jojobaolaj; Tiszta (hígítatlan); Propilénglikol (PG); TEC (trietil-citrát); Egyéb
tr: Parfüm bileşeni taşıyıcı/çözücü türü: DPG (dipropilen glikol); Etanol (alkol); Fraksiyonlanmış hindistan cevizi yağı (MCT); Gliserin; IPM (izopropil miristat); Jojoba yağı; Saf (seyreltilmemiş); Propilen glikol (PG); TEC (trietil sitrat); Diğer
zh-CN: 香料原料载体/溶剂: DPG（二丙二醇）; 乙醇（酒精）; 分馏椰子油 (MCT); 甘油; IPM（肉豆蔻酸异丙酯）; 荷荷巴油; 纯液（未稀释）; 丙二醇 (PG); TEC（柠檬酸三乙酯）; 其他
nb: Bærestoff/løsemiddel for parfymeingrediens: DPG (dipropylenglykol); Etanol (alkohol); Fraksjonert kokosolje (MCT); Glyserin; IPM (isopropylmyristat); Jojobaolje; Ren (ufortynnet); Propylenglykol (PG); TEC (trietylsitrat); Annet
zh-TW: 香水原料載體/溶劑: DPG (二丙二醇); 乙醇 (酒精); 分餾椰子油 (MCT); 甘油; IPM (肉豆蔻酸異丙酯); 荷荷芭油; 純淨 (未稀釋); 丙二醇 (PG); TEC (檸檬酸三乙酯); 其他
sv: Bärare/lösningsmedel för parfymingrediens: DPG (dipropylenglykol); Etanol (alkohol); Fraktionerad kokosolja (MCT); Glycerin; IPM (isopropylmyristat); Jojobaolja; Ren (outspädd); Propylenglykol (PG); TEC (trietylcitrat); Övrigt